Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Chapter 5 County Courts [Repealed]

Cross references. —

As to establishment of a circuit court system, see chapter 9 of this title.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 6, effective July 1, 2000, provides: “A county having a justice of the peace court on August 1, 1999 which continuously maintained the court on and after that date until the effective date of this act [July 1, 2000], shall continue to have that court on and after the effective date of this act. The county shall continue to pay all costs, expenses and salaries for the court as it did on August 1, 1999. Except as provided in W.S.

5-9-119

, a county which continues to have a justice of the peace court on and after the effective date of this act shall not receive the services of the circuit court established under W.S.

5-9-102

. On and after the effective date of this act, the board of county commissioners of the county by resolution may abolish the justice of the peace court in that county effective at the conclusion of the term of office of the then presiding justice of the peace. Upon the conclusion of the term of office of the then presiding justice of the peace, the county immediately and for all lawful purposes shall receive the services of the circuit court for the circuit within which the county lies.”

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 8, provides: “The repeal of any statutes by this act shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, or any penalty or forfeiture incurred, or any right established, accrued, or accruing before July 1, 2000, or any prosecution, suit, or action pending on that day. Except as otherwise provided in this act, every pending prosecution, suit, or action shall be proceeded in, tried, and determined in the circuit court which succeeds to the jurisdiction of the county court or which succeeds to the jurisdiction of the justice of the peace court.”

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 9, provides: “On and after the effective date of this act, each circuit court shall consist of the county courts geographically located within a judicial district in existence on the effective date of this act. All judicial business pending before any county court shall be considered to be pending before the circuit court, and the circuit court judges shall in all respects be the judicial successors in office of all the county court judges and county courts of the county. All judicial files, records, and dockets belonging to or appertaining to the office of the county court judges and county courts of the counties shall be filed in the appropriate office of the circuit court and safely kept therein, or may be stored and shall in all respects constitute records of the circuit court.”

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 10, provides: “On and after the effective date of this act, a county court judge holding office on the effective date of this act shall become a circuit court judge of the circuit court in the judicial district in which he was a county court judge and shall perform the duties of a circuit court judge as provided in this act. The term of office of a circuit court judge who holds that office under this section shall expire on the date his term of office as a county court judge would have expired. He shall be considered an incumbent in the office of circuit court judge, and thus, he shall stand for retention in office as circuit court judge.”

§ 5-5-101.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-101

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§§ 5-5-102 and 5-5-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 5.

Cross references. —

As to establishment of circuit courts, see §

5-9-102

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 261, §§ 2 and 3, related to the establishment of county courts in counties, and related expenses.

§ 5-5-104.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-103

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-105.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-104

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-106.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered
as §

5-9-105

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-107.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-106

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-108.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-107

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-109.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered
as §

5-9-108

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-110.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-109

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-111.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-110

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-112.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-111

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-113.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1978,
ch. 45, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present provisions covering the subject matter of the repealed section, see §

5-9-111

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 13, related to appointment of judges when none were elected.

§ 5-5-114.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000,
ch. 24. § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 14, related to the instruction of judges by the supreme court.

§ 5-5-115.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-112

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-116.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-113

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-117.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-114

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-118.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-115

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-119.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-116

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-120.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered
as §

5-9-117

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-121.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-118

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-122.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-119

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-123.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-120

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-124.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-121

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-125.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-122

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-126.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-123

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-127.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-124

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-128.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-125

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-129.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-126

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-130.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-127

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-131.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-128

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-132.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000,
ch. 24, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 32, related to the jurisdiction of county courts in actions disputing boundaries or title to real property.

§ 5-5-133.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §§

5-9-129

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-134.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-132

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-135.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-133

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-136.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-134

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-137.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-135

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-138.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000,
ch. 24, § 5.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to subpoena duces tecum, see Rules 30(b) and 34, W.R.C.P.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 261, § 38, related to the authority of a judge of a county court to issue a subpoena duces tecum.

§ 5-5-139.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and
renumbered as §

5-9-136

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-140.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

5-9-137

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-141.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-138

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§§ 5-5-142 and 5-5-143.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 5.

Cross references. —

For present provisions regarding appeals, see Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 261, §§ 42 and 43, related to the right to appeal any final judgment or sentence of a county court for review of errors of law.

§ 5-5-144.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-139

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-145.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

5-9-140

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-146.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

5-9-141

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-147.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-142

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-148.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-143

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§§ 5-5-149 through 5-5-151.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 5.

Cross references. —

For present provisions regarding taking of appeals, see Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

As to keeping docket books, see Rule 2, Rules of Supreme Court of Wyoming.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 261, §§ 49, 50 and 51, related to the time and manner for taking appeals from the district court to the supreme court of Wyoming, and to the requirement of keeping uniform docket books.

§ 5-5-152.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-144

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-153.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-145

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-154.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-146

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-155.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-147

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-156.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered
as §

5-9-148

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-157.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-149

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-158.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-150

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-159.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-151

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-160.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-152

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-161.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-153

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-162.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §§

5-9-201

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-163.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered
as §

5-9-202

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-164.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-203

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-165.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-204

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-166.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-205

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-167.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered
as §

5-9-206

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-168.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered
as §

5-9-208

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-169.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

5-9-209

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§ 5-5-170.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered
as §

5-9-210

by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 3.

§§ 5-5-171 through 5-5-175.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 5.

Cross references. —

As to effect of establishment of circuit court system on justice of the peace courts, see editor's note to Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 6, at the beginning of this chapter.

As to effect of establishment of circuit court system on county courts, see editor's notes to Laws 2000, ch. 24, §§ 9 and 10.

As to effect of repeal of statutes by this act, see editor's note to Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 8.

As to transfer of duties of constable to county sheriff, see §§

5-4-401

and

5-4-402

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 261, §§ 71, 72, 74, 75 and 78, related to the establishment of a county court system and its effect upon justice of the peace courts; the effect of the repeal of statutes on prior acts, offenses, penalties, rights, and prosecutions; the transfer of duties and powers from the constable's office to the county sheriff; and the dates after which nominations for constable and justice of the peace were unacceptable.